src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON JUOLLAD !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_EEMEED, attr, juolis, juolâdis, juolâdâs
+A+Attr+Use/NG:is^CSH K ; ! juolis
+A+Attr:âd^CSH%>is  K ; !
+A+Attr+Use/NG:âd^CSH%>âs  K ; !
+A:âd X_EEMEED ;
+A:âd^CSH%>u COMPo ; 
+A:âd^CSH%>â MOS ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:is^CSH%> ATTR_R ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:âd^CSH%>is  ATTR_R ; !
+A+Cmp/Attr:âd^CSH%>âs  ATTR_R ; !
+A:%> A_VUOTA ; 
+A:âd^CSH A_ADV ; !
+A:is^WG%> A_LASJ ; !  

LEXICON A_LITTER !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_LITTER
ATTR ;
+A: X_LITTER ;
!fiskâdub fiskâduboh fijnásuboi vaigâdub tergâdub pehtilub
+A:%>u COMPo ; 
+A:%>u MOS ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:i%>s ATTR_R ;
+A:%> A_VUOTA ;
+A: A_ADV ; !muččâdávt joskâdávt
+A+Attr:i%>s A_LAGAN ; !čapisláván

+A: A_LASJ ; !  


!LEXICON CAVOS_nocomp !!≈ __@CODE@__ directing to X_SAJOS, attr. almos
!!+A+Attr:^FCD^CSH^SVSH  K ; ! čapo
!+A: X_SAJOS	  ;
!+A+Cmp/Attr:  ATTR_R ; !CHECK
!+A:%> A_VUOTA ;
!+A:^CSH^SVSH%> A_LASJ ; !  
!

!LEXICON NANOS !!≈ __@CODE@__ directing to X_SAJOS, attr. noonâ
!!+A+Attr:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN K ; 	! noonâ , as entry in the lexicon file
!+A: X_SAJOS	  ; !nanos
!+A:os%>u COMPo ;  !   nanosub
!+A:os%>u MOS ; !  nanosumos
!!+A+Attr:â^VHIGH^RLEN%> R ;
!+A:%> A_VUOTA ; !nanosvuotâ
!+A: A_ADV ; !  nanosávt
!+A:^CSH^SVSH%> A_LASJ ; !  




LEXICON ALMOS !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_SAJOS, attr. almos
!+A+Attr:^WG^SVSH  K ; !
+A: X_SAJOS	  ;
+A:^WG^SVSH%>u COMPo ; 
+A:^CSH^SVSH%>u MOS ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:^WG^SVSH%> ATTR_R ;
+A:^WG^SVSH%> A_VUOTA ;
+A:^WG^SVSH%> A_ADV ; !almoslávt
+A:^WG^SVSH%> A_LASJ ; !  


!LEXICON A_APINA  __@CODE@__ directing to X_APINA, attr. apina
!+A+Attr:  K ; !placeholder
!+A: X_APINA	  ;
!+A+Cmp/Attr: ATTR_R ;
!+A: A_LASJ ; !  

! We use Pron instead. TODO: Check that all forms are preserved.
!LEXICON MAGGAAR !!≈ **@CODE@** as SOOHAD_NOCOMP, BUT WITHOUT ATTR.
!+A: X_EEMEED ;
!+A:%> A_VUOTA ;
!+A+Attr+Err/Orth:^CSH^SVSH%>is A_VUOTA ; !corp: movtigisvuođâs
!+A:^CSH^SVSH A_ADV ; !jotelávt
!+A+Cmp/Attr:^CSH^SVSH%>is ATTR_R ;
!+A+Cmp/Attr:^CSH^SVSH%>âs ATTR_R ;
!+A:^CSH^SVSH%> A_LASJ ; !  

LEXICON SOOHAD_nocomp !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_EEMEED, attr. sohâdis
+A+Attr:^CSH^SVSH%>is  K ; !sapedis, sapedâs
+A+Attr:^CSH^SVSH%>âs  K ; ! yaml: not +Err/Orth
+A: X_EEMEED ;
+A:%> A_VUOTA ;
+A+Attr+Err/Orth:^CSH^SVSH%>is A_VUOTA ; !corp: movtigisvuođâs
+A:^CSH^SVSH A_ADV ; !jotelávt
+A+Cmp/Attr:^CSH^SVSH%>is ATTR_R ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:^CSH^SVSH%>âs ATTR_R ;
+A:^CSH^SVSH%> A_LASJ ; !  


LEXICON SOOHAD !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_EEMEED, attr. sohâdis
+A+Attr:^CSH^SVSH%>is  K ; !sapedis, sapedâs
+A+Attr+Err/Orth:^CSH^SVSH%>âs  K ; !
+A:^RVSH A_ADV ; !šohâdávt 
+A+Cmp/Attr:^CSH^SVSH%>is ATTR_R ;
+A+Cmp/Attr+Use/NG:^CSH^SVSH%>âs ATTR_R ;
SOOHAD_NOATTR ;

LEXICON SOOHAD_NULLATTR !!≈ **@CODE@** 
+A+Attr:  K ; ! = Nom
+A+Cmp/Attr: ATTR_R ;
SOOHAD_NOATTR ;

LEXICON SOOHAD_NOATTR !!≈ **@CODE@** 
+A: X_EEMEED ;
+A:^CSH^SVSH%>u COMPo ; 
+A:^CSH^SVSH%>u MOS ;
+A:%> A_VUOTA ;
+A:^CSH^SVSH%> A_LASJ ; !  

LEXICON MAAJEEB-COMP !!≈ **@CODE@** comparative lexicon
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Attr:b  K ; !
+A:p P-COMP-ERR-ORTH ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A:b X_EEMEED ;
+A:^RVSH^SVSH%> MUSj ; !maajee


LEXICON PEEGGALM !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_EEMEED, attr. sohâdis
+A+Attr:^CSH^SVSH%>âs  K ; !pegâlmâs
+A+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:^CSH^SVSH%>âs  K ; !pegâlmâs also Pred
+A: X_EEMEED ;
+A:^CSH^SVSH%>u COMPo ;
+A:%>u MOS ;
+A:%> A_VUOTA ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:^CSH^SVSH%>âs ATTR_R ; 
+A:^WG^SVSH%> A_LASJ ; !  


LEXICON JUARBUDEKES !!≈ **@CODE@** 
+A+Attr:ekes K ;
+A+Sg+Nom:ekes K ;	! juárbudekes
JUARBUDEKES_INFL ;

LEXICON JUARBUDEVES !!≈ **@CODE@** 
+A+Attr:eves K ;
+A+Sg+Nom:eves K ;	! juárbudeves
JUARBUDEKES_INFL ;

LEXICON JUARBUDEKES_INFL !!≈ **@CODE@** 
+A+Sg+Gen:iäkká K ;	! juárbudiäkká
+A+Sg+Acc:iäkká K ;	! juárbudiäkká
+A+Sg+Ill:iäkká%>s K ;	! juárbudiäkkás
+A+Sg+Loc:iäkká%>st K ;	! juárbudiäkkást
+A+Sg+Com:iäkk%>áin K ;	! juárbudiäkkáin
+A+Ess:eves%>in K; 		! juárbudevesin
+A:iäkká X_h_PL ;

!+A+Pl+Nom:iäkká%>h K ;	! juárbudiäkkáh
!+A+Pl+Gen:iäkká%>i K ;	! juárbudiäkkái
!+A+Pl+Acc:iäkká%>id K ;	! juárbudiäkkáid
!+A+Pl+Ill:iäkká%>id K ;	! juárbudiäkkáid
!+A+Pl+Loc:iäkká%>in K ;	! juárbudiäkkáin
!+A+Pl+Com:iäkká%>i GUIN ;! juárbudiäkkáiguin
!+A+Pl+Abe:iäkká%>ittáá K ;	! juárbudiäkkáittáá



LEXICON A_KOLME !!≈ @CODE@ ad hoc three syllable stem > LITTER
 A_LITTER ;


LEXICON KUBDUV !!≈ **@CODE@** . It doesn't fit with KAAMUV because of kubduvân, kubduvist
+A+Sg+Nom:uv K ;   	! kaamuv
+A+Ess:âg%>in K ;
+A+Par:âg%>id K ;
+A+Sg+Ill:uv%>ân K ;
+A+Sg+Loc:uv%>ist K ;        		! kammust
+A:u X_KAAMUV_COMMON ;	
+A+Attr:â K ;     !attr. kubdâ, ollâ 
+A+Cmp/Attr:â ATTR_R ;
+A:u%> A_VUOTA ;
+A:âg A_ADV  ;     !kubdâgávt 

LEXICON KUBDUV_COMP !!≈ **@CODE@** 
+A:^WG%> CMUS ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>eb K ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN%>eb K ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN%>eb K ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill:^WG%>bân K ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Loc:^WG%>bist K ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Com:^WG%>báin K ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Abe:^WG^RLEN%>ebttáá K ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Ess:^WG%>bin K ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Par:^WG%>bid K ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom:^WG%>beh K ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen:^WG%>bij K ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc:^WG%>bijd K ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ill:^WG%>báid K ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Loc:^WG%>bijn K ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com:^WG%>bij GUIN ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Abe:^WG%>bijttáá K ;


!! ## Contracted stems
! ----------------

LEXICON ALKKEE  !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_TAHHEE, attr. älkkees
+A+Attr:^SV^SLENs K ; ! älkkees
!+A+Ess:jin K ; ! älkkeejin is wrong, shall be älkken
ALKKEE_COMMON ;
+A:^SV^SLEN%> A_VUOTA ;
+A: VVCOMPe ; ! assab
+A:^SV^SLEN%> MUS ; ! váiváámus hoppuumus
+A+Cmp/Attr:^SV^SLENs ATTR_R ; 
+A+Cmp/SgNom:^SV^SLEN R ; !ruánáátiälkku

!LEXICON MAKKUU   directing to X_TAHHEE, attr. älkkees
!+A+Attr:s K ; ! älkkees
!+A+Sg+Ill:^SVSH%>vân K ;		! Adjective illative uvân
!ALKKEE_COMMON ;
!+A:%> A_VUOTA ;

LEXICON A_IJJE  !!≈ **@CODE@** 
+v1:ijje PYECCEE ;
+v2:ei4je PYECCEE ;

LEXICON TTETTEE !!≈ **@CODE@** 
    +A+Attr:ttette^SV^SLEN K ; 
           :ttette ALKKEE_COMMON ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:ttette^SV^SLEN ATTR_R ; !pyecceeviäsu ruánáátiälkku
    +A+Attr+Err/Orth:ttitte^SV^SLEN K ; 
           +Err/Orth:ttitte ALKKEE_COMMON ;
+A+Cmp/Attr+Err/Orth:ttitte^SV^SLEN ATTR_R ; !pyecceeviäsu ruánáátiälkku

LEXICON PYECCEE  !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_TAHHEE, attr. pyeccee
+A+Attr:^SV^SLEN K ; 
!+A+Sg+Ill:%>jân K ;		! Adjective illative jân
ALKKEE_COMMON ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:^SV^SLEN ATTR_R ; !pyecceeviäsu ruánáátiälkku


LEXICON ALKKEE_COMMON !!≈ **@CODE@** common for ALKKEE and PYECCEE
+A: X_TAHHEE ;
+A+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>h K ;


LEXICON A_KAANDAS !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_KAANDAS, no attr, half congruence
+A+Attr:âš^WG^RLEN K ; ! kaandâš
+A: X_KAANDAS ;

LEXICON A_TUULAS !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_KAANDAS, no attr, half congruence
+A+Attr:âš^WG^RLEN K ; ! tuulâš
+A: X_TUULAS ;


LEXICON STYERES !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_KAARBIS, attr. stuorrâ
+A+Attr:^FCDâ  K ; ! stuorrâ
+A:^FCD CCOMPe ;
+A:^FCD^SLEN%> CMUS ;
+A+Err/Orth:^FCD%> CMUS ;
+A+Err/Orth:^FCD^SLEN%> MUS ; 
+A: X_KAARBIS ; !
+A+Cmp/Attr:^FCDâ%> ATTR_R ;
+A:^WG%> A_VUOTA ;

LEXICON RIGES !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_KAARBIS, attr. riges, 3st comparision
+A+Attr:^WG^RLEN  K ; ! riges
+A:%>u COMPo ; 
+A:%>u MOS ; 
+A: X_KAARBIS ; !
+A+Cmp/Attr:^WG%> ATTR_R ;
+A+Attr:^WG%> A_VUOTA ;

LEXICON A_ALGAAS
+A+Attr:%>^SV^EA^SLEN%>š K ;
+A: X_ALGAAS ; ! XXX tarkista


!LEXICON A_CISSAAS   __@CODE@__ directing to  X_CISSAAS, not in use yet
!!+A+Attr:  K ; !placeholder
!+A: X_CISSAAS ;
!+A+Cmp/Attr:  ATTR_R ;
